North Carolina statutes. Chapter 8C. Evidence Code.
Article 6. Witnesses.

Rule 601.
General rule of competency; disqualification of witness.

General rule. — Every person is competent to be a witness except as otherwise provided in these rules.

Disqualification of witness in general. — A person is disqualified to testify as a witness when the court determines that the person is (1) incapable of expressing himself or herself concerning the matter as to be understood, either directly or through interpretation by one who can understand him or her, or (2) incapable of understanding the duty of a witness to tell the truth.

Disqualification of interested persons. — Upon the trial of an action, or the hearing upon the merits of a special proceeding, a party or a person interested in the event, or a person from, through or under whom such a party or interested person derives his or her interest or title by assignment or otherwise, shall not be examined as a witness in his or her own behalf or interest, or in behalf of the party succeeding to his or her title or interest, against the executor, administrator or survivor of a deceased person, or the guardian of an incompetent person, or a person deriving his or her title or interest from, through or under a deceased or incompetent person by assignment or otherwise, concerning any oral communication between the witness and the deceased or incompetent person. However, this subdivision shall not apply when:

The executor, administrator, survivor, guardian, or person so deriving title or interest is examined in his or her own behalf regarding the subject matter of the oral communication.

The testimony of the deceased or incompetent person is given in evidence concerning the same transaction or communication.

Evidence of the subject matter of the oral communication is offered by the executor, administrator, survivor, guardian or person so deriving title or interest.Nothing in this subdivision shall preclude testimony as to the identity of the operator of a motor vehicle in any case.

Nothing in this subdivision shall preclude testimony as to the identity of the operator of a motor vehicle in any case.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1; 2011-29, s. 2.

Commentary

Subdivision (a) is identical to the first sentence of Fed. R. Evid. 601. The second sentence of Fed. R. Evid. 601 concerns the application of state law in diversity cases and was omitted. Fed. R. Evid. 601 does not contain subdivision (b) on disqualification of a witness.

This rule eliminates all grounds of incompetency not specifically recognized in subdivision (b) or (c) or the succeeding rules of this Article.

At common law husband and wife were incompetent to testify in an action to which either was a party. However, by statute, each spouse has been competent to testify for or against the other in all civil actions and proceedings, with two rigidly defined exceptions. One exception makes one spouse incompetent to testify “for or against the other . . . in any action or proceeding for or on account of criminal conversation. . . .”

G.S. 8-56

. With respect to this exception Professor Brandis states:

“It is hard to find a purpose except one based on notions of delicacy, and even this is frustrated by permitting the plaintiff husband to testify to his wife’s improper relations with the defendant. Danger of collusion would seem to be no greater than in any other case, and the interest of the state in the marriage relation, which only doubtfully justifies extreme measures to prevent collusion in divorce litigation, is no excuse for a rule of incompetency in criminal conversation actions.”
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 58, at 232, n. 28 (1982).

The other exception bars a spouse from testifying “for or against the other in any action or proceeding in consequence of adultery.”

G.S. 8-56

. This exception is supplemented by

G.S. 50-10

which provides that in divorce actions “neither the husband nor the wife shall be a competent witness to prove the adultery of the other, nor shall the admissions of either party be received as evidence to prove such fact.” With respect to this exception, Professor Brandis notes that if the original purpose was to prevent collusion in divorce actions, “[I]t would seem that the prohibition should have been repealed when a relatively short period of separation was made a ground for divorce.”
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 58, at 230, n. 20 (1982).

At common law the spouse of a criminal defendant was incompetent to testify. This incompetence was removed by

G.S. 8-57

so far as testifying for the defendant was concerned. With respect to testimony against the other spouse,

G.S. 8-57

left in force the common law rule of incompetence. In
State
v.

Freeman,

302 N.C. 591

(1981), the court removed the incompetence to testify against the other spouse (except to the extent that it preserved the privilege against disclosure of confidential communications). During the 1983 Legislative Session G.S. 8-57 was rewritten and now provides that the spouse of the defendant is competent but not compellable to testify for the State against the defendant except that the spouse is both competent and compellable to testify in the following cases:

In a prosecution for bigamy or criminal cohabitation, to prove the fact of marriage and facts tending to show the absence of divorce or annulment;

In a prosecution for assaulting or communicating a threat to the other spouse;

In a prosecution for trespass in or upon the separate lands or residence of the other spouse when living separate and apart from each other by mutual consent or court order;

In a prosecution for abandonment of or failure to provide support for the other spouse or their child;

In a prosecution of one spouse for any other criminal offense against the minor child of either spouse, including any illegitimate or adopted or foster child of either spouse.

The provisions of the previous

G.S. 8-57

which provided that the spouse is a competent witness for the defendant in a criminal action and which also provided that a spouse was not compellable to disclose any confidential communication made by one to the other during their marriage are retained in the rewrite of the statute.

Upon adoption of Rule 601,

G.S. 8-56

and 50-10 should be rewritten to make it clear that a husband or wife are competent to testify. The privilege against disclosure of confidential communications should be retained.

Subdivision (b) establishes a minimum standard for competency of a witness and is consistent with North Carolina practice. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 55 (1982).

Subdivision (c) represents a narrowing of the scope of

G.S. 8-51

[now repealed], the Dead Man’s Statute. The Dead Man’s Statute will now be applicable only to oral communications between the party interested in the event and the deceased person or lunatic, rather than to “a personal transaction or communication between the witness and the deceased person or lunatic.” Subdivision (c) preserves the exceptions already existing in

G.S. 8-51

and adds subsection (3) which is a statement of the North Carolina case law having to do with one way in which “the door can be opened.” See
Carswell v. Greene,

253 N.C. 266

, 270 (1960);

Brandis on North Carolina Evidence

§ 75, at 282, 283 (1982).

It was not the intent of the drafters of subdivision (c) to change any existing cases where the Dead Man’s Statute has been held to be inapplicable, or where, because of the actions of one party or the other the protection of the rule has been held to be waived. For example, subdivision (c) would not change the results in
Smith v. Perdue,

258 N.C. 686

(1963) or

In re Chisman,

175 N.C. 420

(1918). The report of the Legislative Research Commission’s Study Committee on the Laws of Evidence to the 1983 General Assembly did not contain subdivision (c), nor did the original versions of House Bill 96 and Senate Bill 43. This would have completely eliminated the Dead Man’s Statute, which has been much criticized. In Professor Brandis’ view, for example:

“[T]he statute has fostered more injustice than it has prevented and has led to an unholy waste of the time and ingenuity of judges and counsel. The situation calls for more than legislative tinkering. What is needed is repeal of the statute.”
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 66 at 258, n. 62 (1982).

However, subdivision (c) was added to Rule 601 because of a concern that fraud and hardship could result if an interested party could testify concerning an oral communication with the deceased or lunatic.

G.S. 8-51

should be repealed after this rule is adopted.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-29, s. 2, effective April 7, 2011, throughout Rule 601, substituted “guardian” for “committee” and “incompetent person” for “lunatic,” and made gender-neutralizing changes.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on the admissibility of a criminal defendant’s hypnotically refreshed testimony, see 10 Campbell L. Rev. 311 (1988).

Rule 602.
Lack of personal knowledge.

A witness may not testify to a matter unless evidence is introduced sufficient to support a finding that he has personal knowledge of the matter. Evidence to prove personal knowledge may, but need not, consist of the testimony of the witness himself. This rule is subject to the provisions of Rule 703, relating to opinion testimony by expert witnesses.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule, which is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 602, restates the traditional common-law rule in North Carolina barring a witness from testifying to a fact of which he has no direct personal knowledge. See
Robbins
v.

C. W. Myers Trading Post, Inc.,

251 N.C. 663

(1960). A witness who testifies to a fact which can be perceived by the senses must have had an opportunity to observe and must have actually observed the facts. The Advisory Committee’s Note states that:

“These foundation requirements may, of course, be furnished by the testimony of the witness himself; hence personal knowledge is not an absolute but may consist of what the witness thinks he knows from personal perception. * * * It will be observed that the rule is in fact a specialized application of the provisions of Rule 104(b) on conditional relevancy.”

Preliminary determination of personal knowledge need not be explicit but may be implied from the witness’ testimony.

Rule 602 applies to hearsay statements admitted under the hearsay exception rules in that admissibility of a hearsay statement is predicated on the foundation requirement of the witness’ personal knowledge of the making of the statement itself. However, it is not intended that firsthand knowledge be required where a hearsay exception necessarily embraces secondhand knowledge (e.g. Rules 803(8)(C) and 803(23)).

Rule 602 is subject to Rule 703 relating to expert witnesses.

Rule 603.
Oath or affirmation.

Before testifying, every witness shall be required to declare that he will testify truthfully, by oath or affirmation administered in a form calculated to awaken his conscience and impress his mind with his duty to do so.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 603 and is in accord with North Carolina practice. The Advisory Committee’s Note states that:

“The rule is designed to afford the flexibility required in dealing with religious adults, atheists, conscientious objectors, mental defectives, and children. Affirmation is simply a solemn undertaking to tell the truth; no special verbal formula is required.”

Rule 604.
Interpreters.

An interpreter is subject to the provisions of these rules relating to qualification as an expert and the administration of an oath or affirmation that he will make a true translation.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 604. There are no North Carolina cases on this point.

Rule 605.
Competency of judge as witness.

The judge presiding at the trial may not testify in that trial as a witness. No objection need be made in order to preserve the point.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule, which is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 605, prevents a judge from testifying in a trial over which he is presiding. The Advisory Committee’s Note states that:

“The rule provides for an ‘automatic objection’. To require an actual objection would confront the opponent with a choice between not objecting, with the result of allowing the testimony, and objecting, with the probable result of excluding the testimony but at the price of continuing the trial before a judge likely to feel that his integrity had been attacked by the objector.”

G.S. 15A-1223

requires a judge in a criminal case to disqualify himself if he is a witness in the case upon motion of the State or the defendant. Upon adoption of Rule 605, a conforming amendment should be made to

G.S. 15A-1223

to remove the requirement for a motion to disqualify.

The question of whether a judge may testify in civil proceedings over which he is presiding does not appear to have arisen in North Carolina. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 53, at 198 (1982).

Rule 606.
Competency of juror as witness.

At the trial. — A member of the jury may not testify as a witness before that jury in the trial of the case in which he is sitting as a juror. If he is called so to testify, the opposing party shall be afforded an opportunity to object out of the presence of the jury.

Inquiry into validity of verdict or indictment. — Upon an inquiry into the validity of a verdict or indictment, a juror may not testify as to any matter or statement occurring during the course of the jury’s deliberations or to the effect of anything upon his or any other juror’s mind or emotions as influencing him to assent to or dissent from the verdict or indictment or concerning his mental processes in connection therewith, except that a juror may testify on the question whether extraneous prejudicial information was improperly brought to the jury’s attention or whether any outside influence was improperly brought to bear upon any juror. Nor may his affidavit or evidence of any statement by him concerning a matter about which he would be precluded from testifying be received for these purposes.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 606.

Subdivision (a) provides that a juror may not testify as a witness in the trial in which he is sitting as a juror. There are no North Carolina cases on this point.

The Advisory Committee’s Note to subdivision (a) states:

“The considerations which bear upon the permissibility of testimony by a juror in the trial in which he is sitting as juror bear an obvious similarity to those evoked when the judge is called as a witness. See Advisory Committee’s Note to Rule 605. The judge is not, however, in this instance so involved as to call for departure from usual principles requiring objection to be made; hence the only provision on objection is that opportunity be afforded for its making out of the presence of the jury. Compare Rule 605.”

Subdivision (b) concerns an inquiry into the validity of a verdict or indictment. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Whether testimony, affidavits, or statements of jurors should be received for the purpose of invalidating or supporting a verdict or indictment, and if so, under what circumstances, has given rise to substantial differences of opinion. The familiar rubric that a juror may not impeach his own verdict, dating from Lord Mansfield’s time, is a gross oversimplification. The values sought to be promoted by excluding the evidence include freedom of deliberation, stability and finality of verdicts, and protection of jurors against annoyance and embarrassment.
McDonald
v.

Pless,

238 U.S. 264 (1915). On the other hand, simply putting verdicts beyond effective reach can only promote irregularity and injustice. The rule offers an accommodation between these competing considerations.

The mental operations and emotional reactions of jurors in arriving at a given result would, if allowed as a subject of inquiry, place every verdict at the mercy of jurors and invite tampering and harassment. * * * The authorities are in virtually complete accord in excluding the evidence. * * * As to matters other than mental operations and emotional reactions of jurors, substantial authority refuses to allow a juror to disclose irregularities which occur in the jury room, but allows his testimony as to irregularities occurring outside and allows outsiders to testify as to occurrences both inside and out. * * * However, the door of the jury room is not necessarily a satisfactory dividing point, and the Supreme Court has refused to accept it for every situation.
Mattox
v.

United States,

146 U.S. 140, . . . (1892). Under the federal decisions the central focus has been upon insulation in the manner in which the jury reached its verdict, and this protection extends to each of the components of deliberation, including arguments, statements, discussions, mental and emotional reactions, votes, and any other feature of the process. Thus testimony or affidavits of jurors have been held incompetent to show a compromise verdict,

Hyde

v.

United States,

225 U.S. 347, 382 (1912); a quotient verdict,

McDonald

v.

Pless,

238 U.S. 264, (1915); speculation as to insurance coverage,

Holden

v.

Porter,

405 F.2d 878 (10th Cir. 1969),

Farmers Coop. Elev. Ass’n

v.

Strand,

382 F.2d 224, 230 (8th Cir. 1967), cert. denied, 389 U.S. 1014; misinterpretation of instructions,

Farmers Coop. Elev. Ass’n

v.

Strand,

supra; mistake in returning verdict,

United States

v.

Chereton,

309 F.2d 197 (6th Cir. 1962); interpretation of guilty plea by one defendant as implicating others,

United States

v.

Crosby,

294 F.2d 928, 949 (2d Cir. 1961). The policy does not, however, foreclose testimony by jurors as to prejudicial extraneous information or influences injected into or brought to bear upon the deliberative process. Thus a juror is recognized as competent to testify to statements by the bailiff or the introduction of a prejudicial newspaper account into the jury room,

Mattox

v.

United States,

146 U.S. 140 (1892). See also

Parker

v.

Gladden,

385 U.S. 363 (1966).”

The exclusion is intended to encompass testimony about mental processes and testimony about any matter or statement occurring during the deliberations, except that testimony of either of these two types can be admitted if it relates to extraneous prejudicial information or improper outside influence.

The general rule in North Carolina has been that a juror’s testimony or affidavit will not be received to impeach the verdict of the jury.
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 65 (1982). The North Carolina rule, unlike Rule 606, does not apply to attempts to support a verdict.

Id.

An express, though limited exception to the anti-impeachment rule is provided in

G.S. 15A-1240

, which should be amended to conform to Rule 606.

Also, the Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“This rule does not purport to specify the substantive grounds for setting aside verdicts for irregularity; it deals only with the competency of jurors to testify concerning those grounds. Allowing them to testify as to matters other than their own inner reactions involves no particular hazard to the values sought to be protected. The rule is based upon this conclusion. It makes no attempt to specify the substantive grounds for setting aside verdicts for irregularity.”

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Jury Misconduct, Jury Interviews, and the Federal Rules of Evidence: Is the Broad Exclusionary Principle of Rule 606(b) Justified?,” see 66 N.C.L. Rev. 509 (1988).

Rule 607.
Who may impeach.

The credibility of a witness may be attacked by any party, including the party calling him.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 607. The rule abandons the traditional common law rule that a party “vouches” for a witness by calling him and, therefore, may not impeach his own witness. The traditional rule has been the subject of numerous exceptions. See N.C. Civ. Pro. Rule 43(b);
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 40 (1982). The substantial inroads into the old rule made by statutes and decisions are evidence of doubts as to its basic soundness and workability. As the Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The traditional rule against impeaching one’s own witness is abandoned as based on false premises. A party does not hold out his witnesses as worthy of belief, since he rarely has a free choice in selecting them. Denial of the right leaves the party at the mercy of the witness and the adversary.”

The impeaching proof must be relevant within the meaning of Rule 401 and Rule 403 and must in fact be impeaching. See Ordover,
Surprise! That Damaging Turncoat Witness Is Still With Us,
5 Hofstra L. Rev. 65, 70 (1976).

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “State v. Hunt: Rekindling Requirements for Impeaching One’s Own Witness,” see 68 N.C. L. Rev. 1236 (1990).

Rule 608.
Evidence of character and conduct of witness.

Opinion and reputation evidence of character. — The credibility of a witness may be attacked or supported by evidence in the form of reputation or opinion as provided in Rule 405(a), but subject to these limitations: (1) the evidence may refer only to character for truthfulness or untruthfulness, and (2) evidence of truthful character is admissible only after the character of the witness for truthfulness has been attacked by opinion or reputation evidence or otherwise.

Specific instances of conduct. — Specific instances of the conduct of a witness, for the purpose of attacking or supporting his credibility, other than conviction of crime as provided in Rule 609, may not be proved by extrinsic evidence. They may, however, in the discretion of the court, if probative of truthfulness or untruthfulness, be inquired into on cross-examination of the witness (1) concerning his character for truthfulness or untruthfulness, or (2) concerning the character for truthfulness or untruthfulness of another witness as to which character the witness being cross-examined has testified.The giving of testimony, whether by an accused or by any other witness, does not operate as a waiver of his privilege against self-incrimination when examined with respect to matters which relate only to credibility.

The giving of testimony, whether by an accused or by any other witness, does not operate as a waiver of his privilege against self-incrimination when examined with respect to matters which relate only to credibility.

The giving of testimony, whether by an accused or by any other witness, does not operate as a waiver of his privilege against self-incrimination when examined with respect to matters which relate only to credibility.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 608, except for the addition of the phrase “as provided in Rule 405(a)” to subdivision (a).

Subdivision (a) allows the credibility of a witness to be attacked or supported by evidence in the form of reputation or opinion. Admitting opinion evidence to prove character is a change in North Carolina practice. See Commentary to Rule 405. The reference to Rule 405(a) is to make it clear that expert testimony on the credibility of a witness is not admissible.

The rule in North Carolina has been that evidence of a specific trait of character is admissible only if asked on cross-examination or if “volunteered” by the witness on direct examination in answer to a question which asks if the witness knows the general reputation or reputation and character of the subject. In both cases, the witness may testify to character traits that are wholly irrelevant to any issue in the case.
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§§ 114, 115 (1982). The North Carolina rule is unique, and appears to have its origin in a misinterpretation of earlier opinions.

Id.

§ 114.

The first limitation of subdivision (a) changes this result by confining evidence of specific traits of a witness to character for truthfulness or untruthfulness and permitting counsel to ask questions regarding these traits on direct examination or cross-examination. However, evidence of
truthfulness
is permitted only after the character of the witness for truthfulness has been attacked.

In North Carolina the necessity for impeachment as a prerequisite to corroboration has been more theoretical than real.
Id.
§ 50. Adoption of this rule strengthens the limitation. The Advisory Committee’s Note states that:

“Opinion or reputation that the witness is untruthful specifically qualifies as an attack under the rule, and evidence of misconduct, including conviction of crime, and of corruption also fall within this category. Evidence of bias or interest does not. McCormick § 49; 4 Wigmore §§ 1106, 1107. Whether evidence in the form of contradiction is an attack upon the character of the witness must depend upon the circumstances. McCormick § 49. (
Cf.
4 Wigmore §§ 1108, 1109).”

As to the use of specific instances on direct by an opinion witness, see the Commentary to Rule 405,
supra.

Subdivision (b) generally bars evidence of specific instances of conduct of a witness for the purpose of attacking or supporting his credibility. Evidence of wrongful acts admissible under Rule 404(b) is not within this rule and is admissible by extrinsic evidence or by cross-examination of any witness.

There are two exceptions under subdivision (b). Conviction of a crime as a technique of impeachment is treated in detail in Rule 609 and is merely recognized in this rule as an exception to the general rule excluding evidence of specific incidents for impeachment purposes.

The second exception allows particular instances of conduct, though not the subject of criminal conviction, to be inquired into on cross-examination of the principal witness himself or of a witness who testifies concerning his character for truthfulness. Current North Carolina practice allows only inquiry concerning the specific acts of the principal witness himself.
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§§ 111, 115 (1982). The Advisory Committee’s Note states that:

“Effective cross-examination demands that some allowance be made for going into matters of this kind, that the possibilities of abuse are substantial. Consequently safeguards are erected in the form of specific requirements that the instances inquired into be probative of truthfulness or its opposite and not remote in time. Also, the overriding protection of Rule 403 requires that the probative value not be outweighed by danger of unfair prejudice, confusion of issues, or misleading the jury, and that of Rule 611 bars harassment and undue embarrassment.”

The last sentence of Rule 608 constitutes a rejection of the doctrine of such cases as
State
v.

Foster,

284 N.C. 259

(1973), that any past criminal act relevant to credibility may be inquired into on cross-examination, in apparent disregard of the privilege against self-incrimination. As the Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“While it is clear that an ordinary witness cannot make a partial disclosure of incriminating matter and then invoke the privilege on cross-examination, no tenable contention can be made that merely by testifying he waives his right to foreclose inquiry on cross-examination into criminal activities for the purpose of attacking his credibility. So to hold would reduce the privilege to a nullity. While it is true that an accused, unlike an ordinary witness, has an option whether to testify, if the option can be exercised only at the price of opening up inquiry as to any and all criminal acts committed during his lifetime, the right to testify could scarcely be said to possess much vitality. In
Griffin
v.

California,

380 U.S. 609, 85 S. Ct. 1229, 14 L. Ed. 2d. 106 (1965), the Court held that allowing comment on the election of an accused not to testify exacted a constitutionally impermissible price, and so here. While no specific provision in terms confers constitutional status on the right of an accused to take the stand in his own defense, the existence of the right is so completely recognized that a denial of it or substantial infringement upon it would surely be of due process dimensions. See

Ferguson

v.

Georgia,

365 U.S. 570, 81 S. Ct. 756, 5 L. Ed. 2d. 783 (1961); McCormick, § 131; 8 Wigmore § 2276 (McNaughton Rev. 1961). In any event, wholly aside from constitutional considerations, the provision represents a sound policy.”

See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 111, at 409, n. 28 (1982).

Legal Periodicals.

For note on the future of character impeachment in North Carolina, in light of State v. Jean,

310 N.C. 157

, 311 S.E.2d 266 (1984), see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 535 (1985).

For essay, “Credence, Character, and the Rules of Evidence: Seeing Through the Liar’s Tale,” see 1993 Duke L.J. 776.

For Survey of Developments in North Carolina Law (1992), see 71 N.C.L. Rev. 1893 (1993).

For article, “Issues Once Moot: The Other Evidentiary Objections to the Admission of Exculpatory Polygraph Examinations,” see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1045 (1997).

Rule 609.
Impeachment by evidence of conviction of crime.

General rule. — For the purpose of attacking the credibility of a witness, evidence that the witness has been convicted of a felony, or of a Class A1, Class 1, or Class 2 misdemeanor, shall be admitted if elicited from the witness or established by public record during cross-examination or thereafter.

Time limit. — Evidence of a conviction under this rule is not admissible if a period of more than 10 years has elapsed since the date of the conviction or of the release of the witness from the confinement imposed for that conviction, whichever is the later date, unless the court determines, in the interests of justice, that the probative value of the conviction supported by specific facts and circumstances substantially outweighs its prejudicial effect. However, evidence of a conviction more than 10 years old as calculated herein is not admissible unless the proponent gives to the adverse party sufficient advance written notice of intent to use such evidence to provide the adverse party with a fair opportunity to contest the use of such evidence.

Effect of pardon. — Evidence of a conviction is not admissible under this rule if the conviction has been pardoned.

Juvenile adjudications. — Evidence of juvenile adjudications is generally not admissible under this rule. The court may, however, in a criminal case allow evidence of a juvenile adjudication of a witness other than the accused if conviction of the offense would be admissible to attack the credibility of an adult and the court is satisfied that admission in evidence is necessary for a fair determination of the issue of guilt or innocence.

Pendency of appeal. — The pendency of an appeal therefrom does not render evidence of a conviction inadmissible. Evidence of the pendency of an appeal is admissible.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1; 1999-79, s. 1.

Commentary

Subdivision (a) differs from Fed. R. Evid. 609(a), which permits, for purposes of attacking the credibility of a witness, evidence of conviction of a felony or a crime that involves dishonesty or false statement. The current practice in North Carolina is that any sort of criminal offense may be the subject of inquiry for the purpose of attacking credibility.

Subdivision (a) provides that evidence of a crime punishable by more than 60 days confinement shall be admissible. This is the standard used in the Fair Sentencing Act in defining an aggravating factor. See G.S. 15A-1340.4(a)(1)(o). This includes convictions occurring in other states, the District of Columbia, and the United States even though the crime for which the defendant was convicted would not have been a crime if committed in this state.

Under current North Carolina practice a witness’ denial of a prior conviction “may not be contradicted by introducing the record of his conviction or otherwise proving by other witnesses that he was, in fact, convicted.” However, this prohibition has often been circumvented.
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 112, at 414 (1982). Subdivision (a) allows the record of the conviction to be introduced.

Subdivision (a) also deletes the requirement in Fed. R. Evid. 609(a) that the court determine that the probative value of admitting evidence of the prior conviction outweighs its prejudicial effect to the defendant.

Subdivision (b) is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 609 (b) and departs from the common law in North Carolina in providing a time limit on the use of prior convictions. Generally, evidence of a prior conviction is not admissible under subdivision (b) if more than 10 years has elapsed since the date of the conviction or of the release of the witness from confinement imposed for that conviction, whichever is the later date. Evidence of such a conviction is admissible, however, if the court determines, in the interests of justice, that the probative value of the conviction supported by specific facts and circumstances substantially outweighs its prejudicial effect. A party must give written notice if he intends to use a conviction falling outside the 10-year period.

Subdivision (c) differs from Fed. R. Evid. 609(c) and provides an absolute prohibition of evidence of a conviction that has been pardoned. Current North Carolina practice does not prohibit evidence of such convictions.

Subdivision (d) is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 609(d) and provides that evidence of a juvenile adjudication is generally inadmissible. However, the court in a criminal case may “allow evidence of a juvenile adjudication of a witness other than the accused if conviction of the offense would be admissible to attack the credibility of an adult and the court is satisfied that admission in evidence is necessary for a fair determination of the issue of guilt or innocence.” This is intended to satisfy the requirement of
Davis
v.

Alaska,

415 U.S. 308 (1974). G.S. 7A-677, which provides that the defendant or another witness in a criminal case may be ordered to testify with respect to whether he was adjudicated delinquent, should be amended to conform to this subdivision. Conforming amendments also should be made to G.S. 15-223(b) [see now 15A-145], G.S. 90-96, and G.S. 90-113.14.

Subdivision (e) is the same as Fed. R. Evid. 609(e) and conforms to current North Carolina practice. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
G.S. 112, at 411 (1982).

Rule 610.
Religious beliefs or opinions.

Evidence of the beliefs or opinions of a witness on matters of religion is not admissible for the purpose of showing that by reason of their nature his credibility is impaired or enhanced; provided, however, such evidence may be admitted for the purpose of showing interest or bias.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 610 except for the proviso that explicitly states that evidence of religious beliefs or opinions may be admitted to show interest or bias. The rule clarifies unsettled law in North Carolina concerning whether, for impeachment purposes, a witness may be cross-examined as to his religious beliefs. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 55, at 205 (1982). Evidence probative of something other than veracity is not prohibited by the rule.